Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.060

Relative defined.

As used in RCW 9A.76.070 and 9A.76.080, "relative" means a person:

(1) Who is related as husband or wife, brother or sister, parent or grandparent, child or grandchild, stepchild or stepparent to the person to whom criminal assistance is rendered; and

(2) Who does not render criminal assistance to another person in one or more of the means defined in subsections (4), (5), or (6) of RCW 9A.76.050.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.060.]